Hawaii statutes.
[§329E-3] Opioid antagonist
administration; emergency personnel and first responders. Beginning on
January 1, 2017, every emergency medical technician licensed and registered in
Hawaii and all law enforcement officers, firefighters, and lifeguards shall be
authorized to administer an opioid antagonist as clinically indicated. [L 2016,
c 68, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next